California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) “Resources Planning Act” means the Forest and Rangelands Renewable Resources Planning Act of 1974 (16 U.S.C. Secs. 1601 to 1610, incl.).

(c) “Assessment” means the forest resource assessment and analysis developed pursuant to Section 4789.3.

(d) “Director” means the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(e) “Forest and rangeland resources” means those uses and values associated with, attainable from, or closely tied to, forest and rangelands, including fish, range, recreation, timber, watershed, wilderness, and wildlife.

(f) “Forest land” means timberland defined pursuant to subdivision (g), and other lands that have been withdrawn from timber production, such as units of the state park system, national parks, and wilderness areas.

(g) “Timberland” means land on which is growing a significant stand of trees of commercial species, or potential commercial species, either in public or private ownership or that is generally capable of maintaining a stand of trees in perpetuity and not withdrawn or otherwise devoted to uses other than timber production.

(h) “Timber” means wood fiber of commercial or potential commercial species growing on timberland as defined in subdivision (g).

(i) “Rangeland” means land on which the existing vegetation, whether growing naturally or through management, is suitable for grazing or browsing of domestic livestock for at least a portion of the year. Rangeland includes any natural grasslands, savannas, shrublands (including chaparral), deserts, wetlands, and woodlands (including Eastside ponderosa pine, pinyon, juniper, and oak) which support a vegetative cover of native grasses, grasslike plants, forbs, shrubs, or naturalized species.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 972, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4789.3.

(a) Under policy guidance from the board and in consultation with the Secretary of the Resources Agency, the director shall prepare and submit to the board and the Secretary of the Resources Agency, a preliminary forest and rangeland resource assessment and analysis not later than July 1, 1979, and shall present a full and updated assessment by January 1, 1987, and by January 1 of each fifth year thereafter. The assessment and analysis shall recognize distinct differences in ownership and management of forest and rangeland resources in California between the various public and the various private owners and shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) An assessment and analysis of the supply and availability of the various present and potential forest and rangeland resources of the state, including limits to those supplies imposed by natural site conditions, such as slope stability and erosion hazard, or by governmental restriction, such as special zoning. Among resource potentials to be evaluated are opportunities to accomplish any of the following:

(A) Improve and rehabilitate the understocked timberland in California and to more fully utilize the productive potential for growing and harvesting timber. 

(B) Improve wood fiber utilization and wood product recycling.

(C) Salvage trees infested with insects and diseases on timberland.

(D) Improve the management of forest wildlife and wildlife habitat within the state.

(E) Increase the quantity and quality of recreation available in the state.

(F) Improve and rehabilitate rangeland areas within the state.

(G) Increase the potential to use wood fiber from timberland as an economically viable source of fuel for energy production.

(H) Improve the potential for rangeland forage for domestic livestock production.

(2) An assessment and critique of federal policies with respect to rangeland and timberland. The assessment and critique shall include (A) as to timberlands, a review of the federal government’s national forest revenue sharing program administered pursuant to Section 500 of Title 16 of the United States Code, and (B) as to rangelands, a review of grazing fee charges and revenue sharing policies affecting national forest lands administered by the United States Department of Agriculture, Forest Service. The timber sale revenue sharing and grazing fee policies of the Department of the Interior shall also be reviewed. In conducting the review, the director shall consult with the State Board of Equalization, and with local governments and school districts affected by the federal government’s revenue sharing programs.

(3) An analysis of present and anticipated demand for various forest and rangeland resources in the state.

(4) A description and evaluation of current state programs and responsibilities in cooperative state-federal forest and rangeland resource programs, and management of state and local public forest, range, and related lands.

(5) A discussion of important policy considerations, laws, regulations, management responsibilities, and other factors expected to influence and significantly affect the use, ownership, and management of forest and rangeland resources.

(6) When assessing various resource potentials which could be obtained from forest lands and rangeland, the director shall include an evaluation of probable direct and indirect economic and environmental benefits and costs, including opportunity costs, associated with realizing those potentials.

(b) In preparing the assessment, the director, under policy guidance of the board, shall solicit the cooperation of, and information collected by, public and private organizations, federal forest and rangeland resource agencies, state agencies concerned with forest and rangeland resources, county planning and taxation agencies, and state-supported forest and rangeland resource research agencies. 

(c) For the purpose of assisting the director and the board in preparing the assessment and its revisions, the board may appoint advisory committees it deems necessary. The committees shall consist of individuals with expertise in forest and rangeland resource fields, with particular emphasis on survey and program analysis, and shall include representatives of state agencies concerned with the use of forest and rangeland resources.

(d) In preparation of the assessment, the director shall do all of the following:

(1) Analyze the need to develop and maintain an effective system for the collection, analysis, and display of that data in forms that contribute to the achievement of the purposes of this chapter.

(2) Identify high-priority needs for completing the data base and analytical framework essential to improving the quality of future assessments.

(3) Evaluate the accuracy and completeness of existing data and of steps needed to improve the accuracy and completeness of data for future assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 352, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4789.4.

(a) Based on a review of the assessment prepared pursuant to Section 4789.3, and consistent with Sections 740 and 4513, the board shall prepare a forest resource policy statement.

(b) Such policy statement shall recognize distinct differences between the various public and various private owners of forest resources in the state and should include, insofar as is possible, the following:

(1) A delineation of specific needs and opportunities for promoting both public and private forest resource management programs in California.

(2) A discussion of priorities for accomplishment of program opportunities, with specified costs, results, and possible constraints on implementation.

(3) An analysis of the relation of the alternative forest resource policies to employment opportunities in California.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4804 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 271.)
-------------------------------------------

4789.5.

The board shall hold public hearings on the assessment and the proposed policy statement prepared pursuant to Sections 4789.3 and 4789.4.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4805 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

4789.6.

(a) The board, assisted by the director, shall biennially determine state needs for forest management research and recommend the conduct of needed projects to the Governor and the Legislature.

(b) To facilitate reporting and updating the assessment pursuant to Section 4789.3, the director, under guidance by the board, may prepare and implement a forest resource management information storage and retrieval program regarding forest land conditions in the state. Such program shall be coordinated and integrated to the maximum extent practicable with data storage and retrieval programs of other state and federal agencies and institutions. The director shall review existing forest resource management storage, retrieval, and analysis systems in the institutions of higher learning in this state, and insofar as the board deems desirable, may utilize such systems as a model for the state program established pursuant to this section.

(c) The director shall, as budgetary resources permit, develop a cost-effective and statistically valid system to periodically monitor the extent to which timberland is, or is becoming, less available for the growing and harvesting of timber due to zoning, onsite development, adjacent land uses, ownership patterns, parcel size, or any other factors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1489, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

4789.7.

(a) The director shall convey the assessment and its updates to federal agencies charged with managing public land within the state.

(b) To assure the availability and compatibility of data and scientific information needed for development and implementation of the assessment, the board and the director shall cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture in conducting surveys and analyses as provided for in the Resources Planning Act and with other federal agencies as provided by federal law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4807 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.5. FOREST RESOURCES [4790. - 4812.]



  CHAPTER 1. Forest Resources Improvement [4790. - 4799.05.]

4790.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) Forest lands, while often managed to produce wood fiber for building materials and paper manufacture, also provide public benefits, including employment opportunities in both rural and urban areas, renewable energy, protection and enhancement of air, water, and soil resources, fish and wildlife habitat, and opportunities for aesthetic and recreational enjoyment.

(b) Historically, substantial areas of forest land were not reforested or otherwise managed for optimum production of forest resources following harvest operations, wildfires, unsuccessful attempts to clear the land for other uses, or damage by insects, disease, or other natural catastrophes. As a result, an estimated five million acres of public and private forest land in the state are producing substantially less forest resources than their potential. These areas are inadequately stocked with trees or are occupied by damaged or diseased trees or species of less value for sawtimber and other forest products. Some lands also have suffered from or are threatened with depletion by soil erosion. Water quality and quantity has suffered and fish habitats have also been adversely affected. In areas where forest regeneration has occurred, the present forest stand would often produce significantly greater timber supplies if thinning or other forest improvement investments were made.

(c) Future demand for timber supplies and other demands for forest resources are likely to rise substantially. Future supplies of these renewable resources are presently estimated to decline for a period and then to recover, but at a rate significantly slower than the rate of increase in demand.

(d) Wood waste products and tree or shrub species not normally utilized to produce building materials can provide opportunities for an alternative means to generate electrical energy or could be converted to solid, gaseous, or liquid fuels for transport or industrial use. Future supplies of wood products not usable for building materials, and, therefore potentially available for energy production, will be increased if forest resource improvements are made.

(e) The forest efficiently captures and stores solar energy. Wood products can be produced with a significantly lower energy cost than most competing substitutes. This disparity is likely to increase in the future.

(f) A relatively small amount of forest land is currently being reforested, other than pursuant to the stocking requirements of the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2) applicable following timber harvesting. Obstacles to private investments in reforesting or improving forest lands include: the extraordinarily long time required for such investments to produce income; the risk of loss due to fire, insect, or disease; lack of necessary forestry expertise or knowledge of the potential benefits of improved forest resource management; the difficulty of transferring capital invested in forest resource improvements to other investment opportunities or otherwise using the funds for other needs once the initial investment has been made; and the fact that some forest resource investments, including erosion control measures, may not produce any income recognizable to the landowner.

(g) Over one-half of the privately owned, commercial forest land in the state is owned by nonindustrial landowners. Forest resources that can be provided by these lands will be increasingly important in the future. Yet the owners of these lands often lack forestry expertise, economic incentive, or capital needed to make investments to increase present and future availability of forest resource benefits from their lands.

(h) Investments in public and private forest land are essential if adequate future timber supplies are to be available and if the forest resource system of soil, air, water, and vegetative and animal life is to be maintained in a productive condition for the future. These investments will also lessen fire hazards and improve watershed protection following catastrophic destruction of forests and other vegetative cover by fire, wind, flood, insects, disease, and other causes.

(i) Failure to make the necessary investments will lead to higher prices for increasingly scarce forest products, lower rural and urban employment in the forest products and related industries and businesses, and the loss or diminished value of soils and other forest resources.

(j) Forest resource improvements made pursuant to this chapter serve a public purpose and will promote the health, welfare, and economic security of the citizens of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4790.5.

The Legislature further declares that, except as specifically provided in this chapter the state shall not claim any right, title, or interest in the land, trees, or other vegetation which are the subject of a forest resource improvement project undertaken pursuant to this chapter. When carrying out this chapter, the director shall encourage the use of goods and services available through private forest nurseries, reforestation contractors, private forest consultants, or others in the business of undertaking forest resource improvement work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4791.

The purpose of this chapter is to encourage private and public investments in, and an improved management of, forest lands and resources within the state to ensure adequate future high quality timber supplies, related employment and other economic benefits, and the protection, maintenance, and enhancement of a productive and stable forest resource system for the benefit of present and future generations.

The primary emphasis of the program established by this chapter shall be upon improving the timber productivity of forest lands in the state; provided, that consistent with this primary goal, the program shall also be managed to improve all forest resources, such as fish and wildlife habitat and soil resources, so that the overall effect of the program is to improve the total forest resource system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 266.)
-------------------------------------------

4792.

In furtherance of the purposes of this chapter, the department is authorized to enter into agreements and make loans and otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter. The forestry assistance program conducted by the department shall encourage forest resource improvements and otherwise facilitate good forest land management through a program of financial, technical, and educational assistance, as well as through applied research. The purpose of this program shall be to work cooperatively with private landowners, particularly smaller nonindustrial landowners, to upgrade the management of their lands, and, therefore, improve both the productivity of the land and the degree of protection and enhancement of the forest resource system as a whole. The department is further authorized to encourage and cooperate with efforts by the forestry industry and federal government to improve the management of forest lands within the state, particularly lands owned by nonindustrial owners, through advisory services or other actions. The director shall work cooperatively with other private and public entities and persons, including tree nursery operators, when carrying out this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 409, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4793.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “A county with high unemployment” means a county with an annual unemployment rate, as reported by the Employment Development Department, higher than the mean annual unemployment rate of “rate adjustment counties” as defined pursuant to the Timber Yield Tax Law (Part 18.5 (commencing with Section 38101) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(b) “Eligible landowner” means any person who meets the conditions set forth in Sections 4797 and 4799. Where ownership of forest land and timber is not held by the same person, “landowner” means either the person or persons owning the land or the person or persons owning the timber.

(c) “Fish and wildlife habitat improvements” means measures designed to protect, maintain, or enhance fish and wildlife habitat including, but not limited to, stream clearance, reestablishment of desirable vegetation along stream channels and elsewhere, measures to encourage habitat diversity, restoration of anadromous fisheries, and forest road repair and upgrading that protect, maintain, or enhance fish and wildlife habitat.

(d) “Followup work” means forest resource improvement work necessary to promote the survival of seed or seedlings planted, or protection or enhancement of other work undertaken, as part of a prior forest resource improvement project pursuant to this chapter.

(e) “Forest land” means land at least 10 percent occupied by trees of any size that are native to California, including native oaks, or formerly having had that tree cover and not currently zoned for uses incompatible with forest resource management.

(f) “Forest land conservation measures” means measures designed to protect, maintain, or enhance the forest resource system, including soil and watershed values, diversity of forest species, and protection of a forest stand from fire. These measures include thinning, shaded fuel breaks, and other land treatments or forest resource improvement projects consistent with Section 4794.

(g) “Forest land with demonstrated potential for improved forest resource management” means forest land that could produce significantly greater forest resource benefits if forest resource improvement work was carried out and that is not managed for uses incompatible with forest resource management.

(h) “Forest resources” means those uses and values associated with forest land, including fish, forage, recreation and aesthetics, soils, timber, watershed, wilderness, and wildlife.

(i) “Forest resource system” means the interdependent system of air, water, solar energy, and forest resources, as defined by subdivision (h).

(j) “Forest resource improvement work” means the forest resource improvement measures enumerated in Section 4794 for which assistance is authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(k) “Forest resource improvement project” means a project undertaken pursuant to Section 4795 or a loan made pursuant to Section 4796.

(l) “Management plan” means a long-term forest and land management plan submitted to the director pursuant to Section 4799.

(m) “Person” includes:

(1) Any private individual, organization, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation.

(2) Except for the purposes of Section 4795 and subdivision (a) of Section 4796, any city, county, or district.

(n) “Prevailing rate” means the average annual rate earned by the state on moneys deposited in the Pooled Money Investment Account in the General Fund.

(o) “Reforestation” means planting of tree seedlings, cuttings, or seed.

(p) “Restocked” means stocking to the degree required by the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2.

(q) “Small business entity” means a business enterprise, including a landowner, with five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or less annual gross revenue.

(r) “Smaller nonindustrial landowners” means owners of 5,000 acres or less of forest land.

(s) “Uses incompatible with forest resource management” means uses not listed in subdivision (h) of Section 51104 or Section 51111 of the Government Code by the city or county in which the parcel subject to a forest resource improvement project lies.

(t) “Young growth stand improvement” means precommercial thinning or weeding of young growth stands to provide more growing space and release of young trees from competing vegetation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 409, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4794.

(a) Agreements may be entered into and loans may be made by the director pursuant to this chapter for all of the following purposes:

(1) Preparation of management plans for forest land.

(2) Site preparation.

(3) Planting and costs of seeds and seedlings.

(4) Young growth stand improvement.

(5) Forest land conservation measures.

(6) Fish and wildlife habitat improvement.

(7) Followup work.

Consistent with this section, the director shall prepare, and submit to the board for its review and approval, guidelines further specifying the scope of forest resource improvement work for which agreements may be entered into or loans made pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Proposed forest resource improvement projects may combine work described in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a). Projects shall include work described in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) to be eligible for a cost-sharing agreement signed pursuant to Section 4795 or a loan made pursuant to Section 4796.

(c) Projects for forest resource improvement subsequent to harvesting subject to the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2, shall not be eligible for agreements executed pursuant to Section 4795 or loans made pursuant to Section 4796 of this chapter unless either of the following occur:

(1) The land has been restocked and the established forest growth has subsequently been adversely affected by fire, wind, flood, insects, disease, or other natural causes.

(2) The work to be undertaken is not otherwise required to be carried out pursuant to the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 409, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4795.

(a) The director may enter into agreements with eligible landowners pursuant to which the landowner will undertake forest resource improvement work in return for an agreement by the director to share the cost of carrying out the work. The director is authorized to share up to 90 percent of the lesser of either:

(1) The landowner’s actual cost per acre to accomplish the work.

(2) The prevailing per acre cost as determined by the director pursuant to Section 4799.02.

(b) (1) The director may provide the funds for the director’s share of the costs, as described in subdivision (a), in advance of any work performed if the
 eligible landowner agrees in writing to undertake the forest resource improvement work and agrees to the condition that funds provided for any uncompleted work shall constitute grounds for a claim and lien upon the real property owned by the landowner that is subject to this section. Any such lien shall attach to the property regardless of whether the responsible party is insolvent. A lien established pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to notice and hearing procedures required by due process of the law.

(2) A lien authorized under this subdivision shall continue in effect until the liability for repayment of funds, or a judgment against the responsible party, is satisfied. However, if it is determined by the court that the judgment against the responsible party will not be satisfied, the department may exercise its rights under the lien.

(3) A lien imposed pursuant to
 this subdivision shall have the force and effect of, and the same priority as, a judgment lien upon its recordation in the county in which the property subject to the lien is located. The lien shall contain the legal description of the real property, the assessor’s parcel number, and the name of the owner of record, as shown on the latest assessor’s property tax assessment roll.

(4) All funds recovered pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund established pursuant to Section 4629.3.

(c) The director shall prepare a schedule of cost share percentages applicable to agreements undertaken pursuant to this section. Required landowner cost share contributions may be made in the form of materials, services, or equipment as well as funds. The cost share percentage schedule shall set forth the percentage of required landowner’s
 project cost share for various categories of forest resource improvement projects. The percentage of cost sharing required of the landowner may be decreased if the ownership contains less than 500 acres.

(d) The percentage of cost sharing required of the landowner may also be decreased to the extent that any of the following applies:

(1) The project or other actions of the landowner would increase recreational opportunities for the public.

(2) The project would provide relatively more employment opportunities than other proposed projects.

(3) Forest land conservation measures or fish or wildlife habitat improvements are included in the project.

(e) Consistent with the criteria set forth in
 subdivisions (c) and (d), the director shall submit a schedule further specifying cost share percentages to the board for its review. The schedule shall apply to all agreements made pursuant to this section unless the board acts to change the schedule within 75 days of its submission by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 220.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4795.5.

A forest landowner who has entered into an undue hardship agreement with the Controller for the payment of inheritance taxes pursuant to Section 14143.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code may apply annually to the director for a grant in the amount of 50 percent of the interest due on the annual installment paid in the current calendar year. To be eligible for such a grant the forest landowner must show that his or her forest land is subject to either:

(a) The provisions of a timberland production zone, pursuant to Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 51100) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code; provided, that no petition is under consideration while the grant is being administered for rezoning pursuant to Section 51120 of the Government Code or immediate rezoning pursuant to Section 51130 of the Government Code.

(b) A contract pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 4797. 

The annual installment must be paid on or before the anniversary date of the first installment payment, or the eligible landowner shall be disqualified from receiving a grant pursuant to this section. The eligible landowner shall apply to the director subsequent to the current calendar year, in such form as the director may prescribe, and shall include proof of agreement with the Controller pursuant to Section 14143.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, proof of payment of the current calendar year’s annual installment of inheritance taxes, and the amount of the installment payment which constituted interest. An eligible landowner who meets the requirements of this subdivision shall be deemed as having submitted an approved application. Within 60 days after receipt of an approved application, the director shall send to the eligible landowner by certified mail a check in the appropriate amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1489, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

4796.

(a) The director may make the following types of loans relating to forest resource improvement projects:

(1) The director may make loans for forest resource improvement work to cover all or part of a smaller nonindustrial landowner’s cost share payment required pursuant to Section 4795. The director shall establish reasonable terms relating to the length of, and the interest rate for, a loan made pursuant to this subdivision. In order to secure repayment of the loan, the forest resource improvement loans shall be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust upon the parcel of land to which the forest improvement project applies. The director shall record the mortgage or deed of trust in the office of the county recorder in the county in which the real property subject to
 the resource improvement loan is located.

(2) (A) The director may make loans for forest resource improvement work to landowners eligible pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 4797 for up to 100 percent of the lesser of either:

(i) The landowner’s actual cost per acre to accomplish the work.

(ii) The prevailing cost per acre as determined by the director pursuant to Section 4799.02.

(B) A loan made pursuant to this subdivision may be made for a term not exceeding 20 years and shall bear interest at the prevailing rate. In order to secure repayment of the loan, the forest resource improvement loans shall be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust upon the parcel of land to which the forest improvement project
 applies. The director shall record the mortgage or deed of trust in the office of the county recorder in the county in which the real property subject to the resource improvement loan is located.

(b) Any loan made pursuant to this section may be paid prior to the maturity date set forth in the loan agreement without an interest penalty being charged to the landowner.

(c) Payment of all or part of the principal and interest due under loans made pursuant to this chapter shall not be required upon a finding by the board that the parcel to which a forest resource improvement project applies, and that is subject to a loan, satisfies both of the following conditions:

(1) The parcel has been substantially damaged by fire, flood, insects, disease, or other natural causes.

(2) The damage was not caused by the negligence or willful act of the landowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 221.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4797.

To be eligible for participation in an agreement pursuant to Section 4795 or loan pursuant to Section 4796, the following conditions must be met:

(a) The application requirements of Section 4799 are satisfied.

(b) The landowner is a person owning forest land. Where the land is owned jointly by more than one individual, group, association, or corporation, as joint tenants, tenants in common, tenants by the entirety, or otherwise, the joint owners shall be considered, for the purposes of this chapter, as one eligible landowner.

(c) With respect to cost-sharing agreements made pursuant to Section 4795 or loans made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4796, the amount of forest land in the state within the ownership of the landowner is 5,000 acres or less.

(d) With respect to loans made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4796, the acreage of the parcel to which the proposed forest resource improvement project applies, together with the acreage included in any other such project subject to an agreement or loan executed or made pursuant to this chapter during the same fiscal year, does not exceed 500 acres; provided, that this limit shall not apply to forest resource improvement projects on lands that have been substantially damaged by fire, flood, insects, disease, or other natural causes within 36 months of submission of an application pursuant to this chapter.

(e) The parcel of forest land to which the forest resource improvement project applies is either:

(1) Within a timber preserve zone established pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 51100) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code; provided, that the parcel of forest land is not the subject of an application for rezoning or immediate rezoning pursuant to Section 51120 or 51130 of the Government Code.

(2) Subject to a contract signed by the landowner providing that the owner agrees not to develop the land for uses incompatible with forest resource management within 10 years following execution of an agreement pursuant to Section 4795 or the making of a loan pursuant to Section 4796. The director shall record the contract in the office of the county recorder in the county in which such parcel of land is located and, upon recordation, the contract shall be binding upon any person to whom such parcel of land is sold, assigned, devised, or otherwise transferred by agreement or operation of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4797.5.

(a) Any cost share payments advanced pursuant to Section 4795 shall be refunded to the director in the event of either:

(1) The filing of an application for rezoning or immediate rezoning pursuant to Section 51120 or 51130 of the Government Code within 10 years of the date an agreement was signed pursuant to Section 4795.

(2) A violation of the contract entered into pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 4797.

The refund shall bear interest at the prevailing rate from the time of the violation as specified in clause (1) or (2) of this subdivision.

(b) Any loan made pursuant to Section 4796 shall immediately become due and payable in the event of either:

(1) The filing of an application for rezoning or immediate rezoning pursuant to Section 51120 or 51130 of the Government Code within 10 years of the making of a loan pursuant to Section 4796.

(2) A violation of the contract entered into pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 4797.

The refund shall bear interest at the prevailing rate from the time of the violation as specified in clause (1) or (2) of this subdivision.

(c) Upon failure by the landowner to refund such payments or loans, the director may place a lien upon the parcel of property to which a forest resource improvement project applied. The director shall record such lien at the appropriate county office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4798.

Cost share payments or loans pursuant to this chapter may be made for forest resource improvement work which is also the subject of payments or other assistance provided pursuant to federal law; provided, that payments or loans may not be made pursuant to this chapter to satisfy landowner cost share requirements of, or repay loans received pursuant to federal law; and provided, further, that the combined state and federal payments, and any required landowner cost share payments, do not together exceed the amount of the actual cost to the landowner or the prevailing cost per acre as determined by the director pursuant to Section 4801, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.

In addition to the requirements of Section 4797, to be eligible to participate in agreements pursuant to Section 4795, or receive loans pursuant to Section 4796, the landowner shall do all of the following:

(a) Submit a long-term forest and land management plan for approval by the director. In the event that the proposed project includes preparation of the management plan, the plan need not be completed at the time of application; provided, that no other forest resource improvement project on forest lands within the same ownership not covered by a management plan may be approved by the director until the management plan has been approved pursuant to this subdivision. The plan shall cover all forest lands within the same ownership which include or are contiguous to the parcel to which a proposed forest resource improvement project applies. The plan shall set forth an analysis of forest land conditions and capabilities, including its original forest type if determinable. The plan shall describe the landowner’s management objectives and shall provide for the eventual harvest of sawtimber within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the preparer of the plan. The plan shall also describe the forest resource improvement work and other measures necessary to do all of the following:

(1) Protect, maintain, and enhance the forest resource system.

(2) Prevent or mitigate erosion, deterioration of soil resources, and pollution by natural and manmade causes.

(3) Optimize the timber growth potential of the land consistent with maintaining the productivity of related forest resources now and in the future.

The plan shall be prepared or approved as to content by a registered professional forester. Such a plan, when approved by the director, shall fulfill the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 51113 of the Government Code. Consistent with this section, the director shall prepare, and submit to the board for its review and approval, guidelines specifying the factors to be considered and information which should be included in management plans submitted pursuant to this section.

(b) Submit a project application in the form prescribed by the director containing such information as the director deems necessary to evaluate the proposed forest resource improvement project.

(c) Agree to comply with state or federal laws applicable to the work carried out pursuant to the proposed forest resource improvement project.
